Massachusetts, session 194th, S2988.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, the Office of 
Consumer Affairs and Business Regulation in concert with the Executive Office of Economic 
Development and Division of Banks shall establish the Massachusetts Financial Literacy and 
Longevity Hub.  
The mission of the hub shall be to democratize access to financial products and demystify 
opportunities for wealth building in the commonwealth. The hub shall be a centralized 
information portal with resources for Massachusetts consumers, including, but not limited to:  
(i) Financial education; 
(ii) Personal financial planning and budgeting; 
(iii) Insurance products, with relevant definitions; 
(iv) Financial tools, with relevant definitions; 

of 7 12  (v) List of accreditable financial institutions, banks, and credit unions, and certified 
financial advisors searchable by geographic zip code; 
(vi) Wealth building opportunities; 
(vii) Retirement planning; 
(viii) Financial independence for individuals with disabilities; 
(ix) Informational Resources regarding purchasing power and debt, including, but not 
limited to, buying a home, paying for education, buying or leasing a new or used vehicle, 
opening a credit card, paying for healthcare expenses 
The hub shall assemble answers to frequently asked questions as well as provide 
opportunities to get in touch with a certified financial advisor, access to relevant consumer 
hotlines, and resources to connect to a regional financial literacy education center, pursuant to 
section 3 of this act. 
SECTION 2. (a) Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, there shall 
be a consortium to be known as the Adult Financial Literacy Education Consortium.  
The consortium shall be appointed and convened by the commissioner of the department 
of higher education and shall consist of 13 members representing interdisciplinary fields 
including, but not limited to, education, financial literacy, higher education, law, banking, 
consumer protection, and social work; provided, at least 1 member shall be the commissioner of 
the division of banks, or their designee; 1 member shall be the undersecretary of the office of 
consumer affairs and business regulation, or their designee; 1 member shall be a representative 
of the Office of Economic Empowerment; 1 member shall be a representative of the 

of 7 33 Massachusetts Bankers Association; 1 member shall be a representative the Cooperative Credit 
Union Association; 1 member shall be a representative of Compass Working Capital; 1 member 
shall be a representative of the Federal Reserve Bank of Boston; 1 member shall be a 
representative of a Massachusetts Community College or public university; 1 member shall be a 
representative of a Massachusetts private insertion of higher education; 1 member shall be a 
representative of the Certified Financial Advisors (CFAs) of Massachusetts; 1 member shall be a 
representative of the Massachusetts chapter of the National Association of Insurance and 
Financial Advisors. The commissioner may appoint other members that the commissioner deems 
appropriate.  
(b) The consortium shall establish recommendations relative to a universal adult financial 
literacy curriculum in the commonwealth, including: (i) priority populations; (ii) curriculum 
components and recommendations; (iii) delivery methods to reach the greatest number of adults 
in the commonwealth, including, but not limited to, community colleges and regional service 
providers; (iv) identify state programs to provide programming, including Massachusetts student 
loan program; and (v) explore opportunities for financial incentives for completing the course.  
(c) The consortium shall submit its recommendations to the shall file a report of its 
findings and recommendations, together with drafts of legislation necessary to carry those 
recommendations into effect, by filing the same with the clerks of the senate and the house of 
representatives and the chairs of the joint committee on financial services within 1 year of the 
effective date of this act.  

of 7 53  (d) Pursuant to the recommendations of the consortium, the department of higher 
education shall establish a universal adult financial literacy curriculum that can be disseminated 
to institutions of higher education and service providers across the commonwealth.  
SECTION 3. Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, there shall be 
regional financial literacy centers situated across the commonwealth that provide access to the 
universal financial literacy program to adults.  
SECTION 4. The Massachusetts department of higher education shall establish a 
competitive grant program to fund financial literacy programs at regional financial literacy 
education centers across the commonwealth free of charge.  
SECTION 5. (a) There is hereby established a special legislative commission pursuant to 
section 2A of chapter 4 of the General Laws to serve to improve the financial literacy and 
education of all people in the commonwealth through development of a statewide strategy to 
promote financial literacy and education. The commission shall solicit input from the public, 
educators, businesses and the financial services industry on financial literacy trends, the 
prevalence of written and online financial education platforms, as well as other resources that 
could be utilized to benefit the people of the commonwealth.  
(b) The commission shall study and review: (1) establishing adult financial literacy 
standards that shall promote an understanding of personal finances including, but not limited to: 
(i) loans; (ii) interest and interest accrual; (iii) using credit and making investments, risks of 
various financial instruments and basic diversification of assets; (iv) online commerce; (v) rights 
and responsibilities of renting or buying a home or making other large purchases or investments; 
(vi) saving, investing and planning for retirement; (vii) the role of banking and financial services; 

of 7 75 (viii) balancing ledgers and checkbooks; (ix) state and federal taxes; (x) charitable giving; (xi) 
evaluating media content, including online content, that relates to personal finance matters; (xii) 
saving, investing and planning for higher education or professional training (xiii) earning and 
spending income, methods of payment, consumer protection, and budgeting; (xiv) protecting and 
insuring assets, preventing identity theft and avoiding online scams; and (xv) emerging 
technologies in the financial industry, a basic understanding of cryptocurrencies, online 
commerce and computer stock-trading, how to evaluate digital media content relating personal 
finance matters and how to recognize risk; (2) existing means, methods and best practices to 
facilitate financial literacy to all people of the commonwealth; (3) the cost to the commonwealth 
to implement an online financial literacy depository or similar application including existing 
materials and resources; (4) the impact of including tax-based or state program credits to 
encourage the completion of financial literacy education; and (5) the exploration of public-
private partnerships to maximize the programs reach and effectiveness for all people in the 
commonwealth. The commission shall report on the potential impact on establishing a state-wide 
financial literacy program for all people in the commonwealth and provide recommendations on 
the future financial literacy in the commonwealth.  
(c) The commission shall consist of: the chairs of the joint committee on financial 
services, who shall serve as co-chairs; 1 member appointed by the treasurer; the secretary of 
education or a designee; the commissioner of banks or a designee; 1 member appointed by the 
Cooperative Credit Union Association; 1 member appointed by the Massachusetts Bankers 
Association; 1 member appointed by the Massachusetts Teachers Association; and 3 members 
appointed by the governor who shall have experience implementing financial literacy education 

of 7 97 programs in the commonwealth. The appointees of the governor shall represent diverse 
geographic areas of the commonwealth. 
(d) Not later than December 1, 2026, the commission shall file a report and its 
100 recommendations with the clerks of the house of representatives and the senate, the joint 
101 committee on financial services. 
102  SECTION 6. Chapter 71 of the General Laws is hereby amended by adding the following 
103 section:- 
104  Section 102. (a) The department of elementary and secondary education shall implement 
105 regulations to require a guaranteed semester long class, for students in 11th or 12th grade, in 
106 personal finance for all Massachusetts public high schools. In addition to curriculum, the class 
107 shall include an experiential learning component or project prior to completion. 
108  (b) Instruction on personal financial literacy shall include, but shall not be limited to: (i) 
109 earning and spending income, local, state and federal taxes, charitable giving, methods of 
110 payment, consumer protection, balancing ledgers and checkbooks and budgeting; (ii) long-term 
111 savings, the role of banks and financial institutions, simple and compound interest, financial 
112 regulation and planning for the future; (iii) using credit and making investments, risks of various 
113 financial instruments and basic diversification of assets; (iv) protecting and insuring assets, 
114 preventing identity theft and avoiding online scams; (v) emerging technologies in the financial 
115 industry, a basic understanding of cryptocurrencies, online commerce and computer stock-
116 trading, how to evaluate digital media content relating to personal finance matters and how to 
117 recognize risk; and (vi) rights and responsibilities of renting or buying a home or making other 
118 large purchases or investments. 

of 7 119  (c)(1) The department shall assist schools in providing: (i) instruction on personal 
120 financial literacy by facilitating access to high-quality curricular materials; and (ii) professional 
121 development opportunities, including trainings, seminars, conferences and materials for 
122 educators to use in the teaching of personal financial literacy. 
123  (2) The department may provide trainings, seminars, conferences and materials for 
124 educators to use in the teaching of personal financial literacy in person or through the use of 
125 synchronous or asynchronous audio, video, electronic media or other telecommunications 
126 technology. 
127  SECTION 7. Section 6 shall take effect beginning in the 2026-2027 school year.